Hawaii, session 2025, HB654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 205A-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "special management area minor permit" to read as follows: ""Special management area minor permit" means an action by the authority authorizing [development the]: (1)  Development, the valuation of which is not in excess of [$500,000] $1,000,000, and [which] that has no substantial adverse environmental or ecological effect, taking into account potential cumulative effects[.]; and (2)  Construction or reconstruction of single-family residential use that is less than seven thousand five hundred square feet of floor area in aggregate; is situated on a shoreline parcel or a parcel that is impacted by waves, storm surges, high tide, or shoreline erosion; and is not part of a larger development." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________